Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Article 8 Alert System for Unapprehended Murder or Rape Suspects

38-3-120.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 38(7)/SB 103, effective May 11, 2007, redesignated former Code Section 38-3-120 as present Code Section 38-3-130.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202, purported to amend and redesignate Code Section 38-3-120 as Code Section 35-3-190 but actually amended and redesignated Code Section 38-3-130 as Code Section 35-3-190.

38-3-130.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 233, § 1/SB 202, effective July 1, 2008, redesignated former Code Section 38-3-130 as present Code Section 35-3-190.